Hawaii statutes.
§205A-49 Adoption of rules. Each
agency charged with carrying out this part shall adopt rules necessary to
implement or comply with this part by July 1, 1990. All rules shall be
adopted under chapter 91. [L 1986, c 258, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 356, §15]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next